Maine, session 132, LD81.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §8, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2021, c. 571, §1, is further
amended to read:
1. School innovation. For the purposes of this section, the term "school innovation"
means the process by which schools and communities use pilot programs and or make
significant changes in the existing school structure, including the policies, procedures,
roles, relationships, pathways, approaches, pedagogies, philosophies and schedules that
influence teaching and learning in the school, in order to support the best learning
environments and opportunities for students. School innovation recognizes the critical
educational role of technology and integrates technology and technological systems in the
classroom, in school governance and in school record keeping. School innovation is based
on:
A. The development of comprehensive educational goals establishing community
expectations for what all students should know, the skills they should possess, the
attitude toward work and learning they should hold upon completing school and the
role of the school in the community;
B. A formal appraisal of the basic structures that govern operation of the school; and
C. A commitment to revise the basic school structure to achieve the comprehensive
educational goals.
School innovation, which is most effectively carried out at the local level, depends on
community and educator involvement and approval and student participation. School
innovation includes may include understanding of the various roles of stakeholders,
including parents, students, teachers, administrators, support staff, postsecondary
education institutions and officials and various segments of the community. It focuses on
understanding and defining the root cause of challenges and innovates and tests solutions.
School innovation may include a significantly broadened role for schools and school
administrative units that engage in education research and development practices that can
be attempted as a pilot program and shared with others. The commissioner may designate
a school administrative unit that engages in education research and development as a
demonstration site.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §8, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2021, c. 571, §1, is further
amended to read:
2. Waiver of rules for local schools. A school administrative unit undergoing
engaged in school innovation may request that the commissioner waive the application of
specific rules to that unit, or to certain schools in that unit, if the waiver is necessary to
achieve the proposed school innovation. The commissioner shall grant a waiver if the
requesting unit, as determined by the commissioner, has:
A. Demonstrated that one or more state rules prevent or seriously handicap inhibit the
unit's pursuit of its school innovation goals;
B. Demonstrated that reasonable steps have been taken to provide the safeguards
offered by the rules in question to allow continued educational progress by students
and protect the continuity and integrity of the unit and employees of that unit;
Page 1 - 132LR0175(01)

C. Provided evidence that the necessary resources and community and staff support
are present to ensure that the innovative changes requiring the waiver stand a
reasonable chance of succeeding; and
D. Informed any bargaining agent or agents representing affected school employees
of the waiver request.; and
F. Demonstrated an intention to engage in professional learning to support school
innovation, which may include, but is not limited to:
(1) Design thinking;
(2) Interdisciplinary methods;
(3) Outdoor learning;
(4) Early childhood education;
(5) Career exploration, including extended learning opportunities, junior
achievement programs, entrepreneurial skills development and student-run
businesses; and
(6) So-called whole student approaches, including, but not limited to, the so-called
Building Assets, Reducing Risks model, community schools, school-based health
centers, alternative education programs, in-district special education programs,
inclusive music and arts programs and inclusive science, technology, engineering
and mathematics and computer science programs.
The department shall provide professional learning and technical assistance to schools
seeking such support for school innovation.
The request for the waiver must include documentation to substantiate the conditions of
this subsection. If the request is denied, the commissioner shall provide the reasons for
denying the request to the school administrative unit.